Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.005

Provisions applicable to "plan 1," "plan 2," and "plan 3."

RCW 41.40.010 through * 41.40.112 shall apply to members of plan 1, plan 2, and plan 3.

[ 2000 c 247 s 101; 1992 c 72 s 8; 1991 c 35 s 69; 1989 c 273 s 20; 1989 c 272 s 7; 1979 ex.s. c 249 s 6; 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 21.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.40.112 was decodified August 1993.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Purpose—1989 c 272: See note following RCW 41.32.005.